California statutes. Insurance Code
(1) Any scientifically or medically identifiable gene or chromosome, or combination or alteration thereof, that is known to be a cause of a disease or disorder in a person or his or her offspring, or that is determined to be associated with a statistically increased risk of development of a disease or disorder, and that is presently not associated with any symptoms of any disease or disorder.

(2) Inherited characteristics that may derive from the individual or family member, that are known to be a cause of a disease or disorder in a person or his or her offspring, or that are determined to be associated with a statistically increased risk of development of a disease or disorder, and that are presently not associated with any symptoms of any disease or disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 311, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.31.

(a) In addition to any other remedy permitted by law, the commissioner shall have the administrative authority to assess penalties specified in this section against self-insured employee welfare benefit plans engaged in the business of health insurance for violations of Section 10123.3.

(b) Any plan that violates Section 10123.3 is liable for administrative penalties of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent violation.

(c) Any plan that violates Section 10123.3 with a frequency that indicates a general business practice or commits a knowing violation of that section, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(d) An act or omission that is inadvertent and that results in incorrect rates being charged to more than one subscriber shall be a single violation for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 695, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.35.

(a) This section shall apply to the disclosure of genetic test results contained in an applicant or enrollee’s medical records by a self-insured welfare benefit plan.

(b) Any person who negligently discloses results of a test for a genetic characteristic to any third party in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization as described in subdivision (g), shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(c) Any person who willfully discloses the results of a test for a genetic characteristic to any third party in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization as described in subdivision (g), shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(d) Any person who willfully or negligently discloses the results of a test for a genetic characteristic to a third party in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization as described in subdivision (g), that results in economic, bodily, or emotional harm to the subject of the test, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(e) In addition to the penalties listed in subdivisions (b) and (c), any person who commits any act described in subdivision (b) or (c) shall be liable to the subject for all actual damages, including damages for economic, bodily, or emotional harm which is proximately caused by the act.

(f) Each disclosure made in violation of this section is a separate and actionable offense.

(g) The applicant’s “written authorization,” as used in this section, shall satisfy the following requirements:

(1) Is written in plain language.

(2) Is dated and signed by the individual or a person authorized to act on behalf of the individual.

(3) Specifies the types of persons authorized to disclose information about the individual.

(4) Specifies the nature of the information authorized to be disclosed.

(5) States the name or functions of the persons or entities authorized to receive the information.

(6) Specifies the purposes for which the information is collected.

(7) Specifies the length of time the authorization shall remain valid.

(8) Advises the person signing the authorization of the right to receive a copy of the authorization. Written authorization is required for each separate disclosure of the test results, and the authorization shall set forth the person or entity to whom the disclosure would be made.

(h) This section shall not apply to disclosures required by the Department of Health Services necessary to monitor compliance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 124975) of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, nor to disclosures required by the Department of Managed Health Care necessary to administer and enforce compliance with Section 1374.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.36.

(a) On or before July 1, 1999, for purposes of public disclosure, every disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, and authorizes insureds to select providers who have contracted with the insurer for alternative rates of payment as described in Section 10133, and the disability insurer or any of its contracting providers or provider groups utilize economic profiling related to services provided to insureds, shall file with the department a description of any policies and procedures related to economic profiling utilized by the insurer and any of its contracting providers and provider groups. The filing shall describe how these policies and procedures are used in utilization review, peer review, incentive and penalty programs, and in provider retention and termination decisions. The filing shall also indicate in what manner, if any, the economic profiling system being used takes into consideration risk adjustments that reflect case mix, type and severity of patient illness, age of patients, and other policyholder characteristics that may account for higher or lower than expected costs or utilization of services. Any changes to the policies and procedures shall be filed expeditiously with the commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or impair the department, in its discretion, from utilizing the information filed pursuant to this section for purposes of ensuring compliance with this chapter.

(b) The commissioner shall make each disability insurer filing available to the public upon request. The commissioner shall not publicly disclose any information submitted pursuant to this section that is determined by the commissioner to be confidential pursuant to state law.

(c) Each disability insurer that uses economic profiling shall, upon request, provide a copy of economic profiling information related to a contracting provider or provider group to the profiled provider or group. In addition, each disability insurer shall require as a condition of contract that its contracting provider groups that maintain economic profiles of individual providers who may be selected by insureds shall, upon request, provide a copy of individual economic profiling information to individual providers who are profiled. The economic profiling information provided pursuant to this section shall be provided upon request until 60 days after the date upon which the contract between the insurer and the individual provider or provider group terminates, or until 60 days after the date the contract between the provider group and the individual provider terminates, whichever is applicable.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “economic profiling” shall mean any evaluation of a particular physician, provider, or provider group based in whole or in part on the economic costs or utilization of services associated with medical care provided or authorized by the physician, provider, or provider group.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.38.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for the prophylaxis, diagnosis, and treatment of Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric Disorder Associated with Streptococcal Infections (PANDAS) and Pediatric Acute-onset Neuropsychiatric Syndrome (PANS) that is prescribed or ordered by the treating physician and surgeon and is medically necessary, as defined by current nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines by expert treating physicians published in peer-reviewed medical literature. Treatment for PANDAS and PANS that shall be covered includes antibiotics, medication and behavioral therapies to manage neuropsychiatric symptoms, immunomodulating
 medicines, plasma exchange, and intravenous immunoglobulin therapy.

(b) Coverage for PANDAS and PANS shall not be subject to a copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or other cost sharing that is greater than that applied to other benefits provided by the policy.

(c) (1) A required authorization for PANDAS and PANS prophylaxis, diagnosis, or treatment shall be provided in a timely manner that is appropriate for the severity of an insured’s condition pursuant to Section 10133.54.

(2) A health insurer shall not deny or delay coverage for
 PANDAS or PANS therapies because the insured previously received treatment, including the same or similar treatment, for PANDAS or PANS, or because the insured was diagnosed with or received treatment for their condition under a different diagnostic name, including autoimmune encephalopathy.

(3) A health insurer shall not limit coverage of immunomodulating therapies for PANDAS or PANS in a manner that is inconsistent with the treatment recommendations pursuant to subdivision (d), and shall not require a trial of therapies that treat only neuropsychiatric symptoms before authorizing coverage of immunomodulating therapies pursuant to this section.

(d) Coverage for PANDAS and PANS shall adhere to the treatment recommendations delineated in current clinical practice guidelines
 published in peer-reviewed medical literature or put forth by organizations composed of expert treating clinicians.

(e) For billing and diagnostic purposes, PANDAS and PANS shall be coded as autoimmune encephalitis until the American Medical Association and the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services create and assign a specific code or codes for PANDAS and PANS. After the creation of that code or codes, PANDAS and PANS may be coded as autoimmune encephalitis, PANDAS, or PANS. If PANDAS or PANS is known by a different
 common name in the future, it may be coded under that name and this section shall apply to that disorder or syndrome.

(f) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that covers dental or vision benefits or a Medicare supplement policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 822, Sec. 2.   (AB 2105)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.4.

If a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan issued, amended, or renewed in this state on or after the effective date of this section provides in any manner for coverage for an employee and a covered spouse dependent upon such employee, the plan shall not provide for coverage under conditions less favorable for employees than coverage provided for covered spouses dependent upon the employees.

As used in this section, “self-insured employee welfare benefit plan” has the same meaning as that specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10121.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.5.

(a) On or after January 1, 1993, every insurer issuing group disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall provide benefits for the comprehensive preventive care of children 16 years of age or younger under those terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the group policyholder and the insurer. Every insurer shall communicate the availability of these benefits to all group policyholders and to all prospective group policyholders with whom they are negotiating.

(b) For purposes of this section, benefits for the comprehensive preventive care of children shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Be consistent with both of the following:

(A) The most recent Recommendations for Preventive Pediatric Health Care, as adopted by the American Academy of Pediatrics.

(B) The Recommended Childhood Immunization Schedule/United States, jointly adopted as of January 1, 2025, by the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices, and the American Academy of Family
 Physicians. Immunizations subject to this subparagraph may be modified or supplemented by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Section 120164.

(2) Provide for the following:

(A) Periodic health evaluations.

(B) Immunizations.

(C) Laboratory services in connection with periodic health evaluations.

(D) Screening for blood lead levels in children who are at risk for lead poisoning, as determined by a health care provider in accordance with the applicable California regulations.

(c) For purposes of this section, a health care provider is any of the following:

(1) A person licensed to practice medicine pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2050) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A nurse practitioner licensed to practice pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) A physician assistant licensed to practice pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 3513) of Chapter 7.7 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 46.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.51.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, that provides coverage for pediatric services and preventive care, as required by this chapter, including Sections 10112.2 and 10112.27, shall additionally include coverage for adverse childhood experiences screenings. This section does not prohibit a health insurer from applying cost-sharing requirements as authorized by law.

(b) For purposes of this section, “adverse childhood experiences,” or “ACEs,” means an event, series of events, or set of circumstances that is experienced by an individual as physically or emotionally harmful or threatening and that has lasting adverse effects on the individual’s functioning and physical, social, emotional, or spiritual well-being.

(c) The department may adopt guidance to health insurers to implement this section. The guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).
 The departmental guidance shall apply the rules and regulations for screening for trauma as set forth in the Medi-Cal program as the minimum ACEs coverage requirements for health insurers. This section does not prohibit a health insurer from exceeding the Medi-Cal program’s rules and regulations for trauma screening.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 641, Sec. 2.   (SB 428)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.55.

(a) On or after January 1, 1993, every insurer issuing group disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer benefits for the comprehensive preventive care of children 17 and 18 years of age under those terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the group policyholder and the insurer. Every insurer shall communicate the availability of these benefits to all group policyholders and to all prospective group policyholders with whom they are negotiating.

(b) For purposes of this section, benefits for the comprehensive preventive care of children shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Be consistent with both of the following:

(A) The most recent Recommendations for Preventive Pediatric Health Care, as adopted by the American Academy of Pediatrics.

(B) The Recommended Childhood Immunization Schedule/United States, jointly adopted as of January 1, 2025, by the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices, and the American Academy of Family
 Physicians. Immunizations subject to this subparagraph may be modified or supplemented by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Section 120164.

(2) Provide for the following:

(A) Periodic health evaluations.

(B) Immunizations.

(C) Laboratory services in connection with periodic health evaluations.

(D) Screening for blood lead levels in children who are at risk for lead poisoning, as determined by a health care provider in accordance with the applicable California regulations.

(c) For purposes of this section, a health care provider is any of the following:

(1) A person licensed to practice medicine pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2050) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A nurse practitioner licensed to practice pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) A physician assistant licensed to practice pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 3513) of Chapter 7.7 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 47.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.6.

On and after January 1, 1990, every insurer issuing group disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer coverage for the treatment of alcoholism under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the group policyholder and the insurer. Every insurer shall communicate the availability of such coverage to all group policyholders and to all prospective group policyholders with whom they are negotiating.

If the group subscriber or policyholder agrees to such coverage or to coverage for treatment of chemical dependency, or nicotine use, the treatment may take place in facilities licensed to provide alcoholism or chemical dependency services under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

Treatment for nicotine use may be subject to separate deductibles, copayments, and overall cost limitations as determined by the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 688, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.61.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2019, a health insurer shall not issue, amend, sell, renew, or offer a policy of short-term limited duration health insurance in this state.

(b) For purposes of this section, “short-term limited duration health insurance” means health insurance coverage provided pursuant to a health insurance policy that has an expiration date specified in the policy that is less than 12 months after the original effective date of the coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 4.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.65.

(a) The maximum amount a health insurer may require an insured to pay at the point of sale for a covered prescription drug is the lesser of the following:

(1) The applicable cost-sharing amount for the prescription drug.

(2) The retail price.

(b) A health insurer shall not require a pharmacist or pharmacy to charge or collect from an insured a cost-sharing amount that exceeds the total retail price for the prescription drug.

(c) The payment rendered shall constitute the applicable cost sharing and shall apply to the deductible, if any, and also to the maximum out-of-pocket limit in the same manner as if the insured had purchased the prescription drug by paying the cost-sharing amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 770, Sec. 3.   (AB 2863)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.67.

(a) On or before July 1, 1997, every disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, as described in subdivision (b), shall file with the department a written policy, which is not subject to approval or disapproval by the department, describing the manner in which the insurer determines if a second medical opinion is medically necessary and appropriate. Notice of the policy and information regarding the manner in which an insured may receive a second medical opinion shall be provided to all insureds in the insurer’s evidence of coverage. The written policy shall describe the manner in which requests for a second medical opinion are reviewed by the insurer.

(b) This section shall only apply to disability insurers covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that contract with providers for alternative rates pursuant to Section 10133 or 11512 and that limit payments under those policies to services secured by insureds from providers charging alternative rates pursuant to the contracts.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require the disability insurer to cover services or provide benefits that are not otherwise covered under the terms and conditions of the plan contract, nor to provide services through providers who are not under contract with the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.68.

(a) When requested by an insured or contracting health professional who is treating an insured, a disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall authorize a second opinion by an appropriately qualified health care professional. Reasons for a second opinion to be provided or authorized shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) If the insured questions the reasonableness or necessity of recommended surgical procedures.

(2) If the insured questions a diagnosis or plan of care for a condition that threatens loss of life, loss of limb, loss of bodily function, or substantial impairment, including, but not limited to, a serious chronic condition.

(3) If clinical indications are not clear or are complex and confusing, a diagnosis is in doubt due to conflicting test results, or the treating health professional is unable to diagnose the condition and the insured requests an additional diagnosis.

(4) If the treatment plan in progress is not improving the medical condition of the insured within an appropriate period of time given the diagnosis and plan of care, and the insured requests a second opinion regarding the diagnosis or continuance of the treatment.

(5) If the insured has attempted to follow the plan of care or consulted with the initial provider concerning serious concerns about the diagnosis or plan of care.

(b) For purposes of this section, an appropriately qualified health care professional is a primary care physician or a specialist who is acting within his or her scope of practice and who possesses a clinical background, including training and expertise, related to the particular illness, disease, condition or conditions associated with the request for a second opinion.

(c) If an insured or participating health professional who is treating an insured requests a second opinion pursuant to this section, an authorization or denial shall be provided in an expeditious manner. When the insured’s condition is such that the insured faces an imminent and serious threat to his or her health, including, but not limited to, the potential loss of life, limb, or other major bodily function, or lack of timeliness that would be detrimental to the insured’s life or health or could jeopardize the insured’s ability to regain maximum function, the second opinion shall be rendered in a timely fashion appropriate to the nature of the insured’s condition, not to exceed 72 hours after the insurer’s receipt of the request, whenever possible. Each insurer shall file with the Department of Insurance timelines for responding to requests for second opinions for cases involving emergency needs, urgent care, and other requests by July 1, 2000, and within 30 days of any amendment to the timelines. The timelines shall be made available to the public upon request.

(d) If an insurer approves a request by an insured for a second opinion, the insured shall be responsible only for the costs of applicable copayments that the insurer requires for similar referrals.

(e) If the insured is requesting a second opinion about care from his or her primary care physician, the second opinion shall be provided by an appropriately qualified health care professional of the insured’s choice who is contracted with the insurer.

(f) If the insured is requesting a second opinion about care from a specialist, the second opinion shall be provided by any provider of the same or equivalent specialty, of the insured’s choice, within the insurer’s provider network, if the insurance contract limits second opinions to within a network.

(g) The insurer may limit second opinions to its network of providers if the insurance contract limits the benefit to within a network of providers and there is a participating provider who meets the standard specified in subdivision (b). If there is no participating provider who meets this standard, then the insurer shall authorize a second opinion by an appropriately qualified health professional outside of the insurer’s provider network. In approving a second opinion either inside or outside of the insurer’s provider network, the insurer shall take into account the ability of the insured to travel to the provider.

(h) The insurer shall require the second opinion health professional to provide the insured and the initial health professional with a consultation report, including any recommended procedures or tests that the second opinion health professional believes appropriate. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the insurer from authorizing, based on its independent determination, additional medical opinions concerning the medical condition of an insured.

(i) If the insurer denies a request by an insured for a second opinion, it shall notify the insured in writing of the reasons for the denial and shall inform the insured of the right to dispute the denial, and the procedures for exercising that right.

(j) If the insurance contract limits health care services to within a network of providers, in order for coverage to be in force, the insured shall obtain services only from a provider who is participating in, or under contract with, the insurer pursuant to the specific insurance contract under which the insured is entitled to health care service benefits.

(k) This section shall not apply to any policy or contract of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and that does not limit second opinions, subject to all other terms and conditions of the contract.

(l) This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity health insurance policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: Amendment by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, was nullified because of Ch. 857's prevailing deferral clause.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.7.

(a) On or after January 1, 1986, an insurer issuing group health insurance shall offer coverage for orthotic and prosthetic devices and services under the terms and conditions that may be agreed upon between the group policyholder and the insurer. An insurer shall communicate the availability of that coverage to all group policyholders and to all prospective group policyholders with whom the insurer is negotiating. Coverage for prosthetic devices shall include original and replacement devices, as prescribed by a physician and surgeon or doctor of podiatric medicine acting within the scope of his or her license. Coverage for orthotic devices shall provide for coverage if the device, including original
 and replacement devices, is prescribed by a physician and surgeon or doctor of podiatric medicine acting within the scope of his or her license, or is ordered by a licensed health care provider acting within the scope of his or her license. An insurer shall have the right to conduct a utilization review to determine medical necessity before authorizing these services.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), on and after July 1, 2007, the amount of the benefit for orthotic and prosthetic devices and services shall be no less than the annual and lifetime benefit maximums applicable to all benefits in the policy. A copayment, coinsurance, deductible, and maximum out-of-pocket amount applied to the benefit for orthotic and prosthetic devices and services shall be no more than the most common amounts contained in the policy.

(c) This section shall not apply to Medicare supplement,
 vision-only, dental-only, or CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, hospital-only, accident-only, or specified disease insurance that does not pay benefits on a fixed benefit, cash payment only basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 5.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.8.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2000, shall provide coverage for screening for, diagnosis of, and treatment for, breast cancer.

(b) No policy of disability insurance that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall deny enrollment or coverage to an individual solely due to a family history of breast cancer, or who has had one or more diagnostic procedures for breast disease but has not developed or been diagnosed with breast cancer.

(c) Every policy of disability insurance shall cover screening and diagnosis of breast cancer, consistent with generally accepted medical practice and scientific evidence, upon the referral of the insured’s participating physician.

(d) Treatment for breast cancer under this section shall include coverage for prosthetic devices or reconstructive surgery to restore and achieve symmetry for the patient incident to a mastectomy. Coverage for prosthetic devices and reconstructive surgery shall be subject to the deductible and coinsurance conditions applied to the mastectomy and all other terms and conditions applicable to other benefits.

(e) As used in this section, “mastectomy” means the removal of all or part of the breast for medically necessary reasons, as determined
 by a licensed physician and surgeon. Partial removal of a breast includes, but is not limited to, lumpectomy, which includes surgical removal of the tumor with clear margins.

(f) As used in this section, “prosthetic devices” means the provision of initial and subsequent devices pursuant to an order of the patient’s physician and surgeon.

(g) For purposes of this section, disability insurance does not include accident only, credit, disability income, specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity, coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, Medicare supplement, long-term care insurance, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment
 insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 449, Sec. 4.   (SB 255)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.81.

(a) An individual or group policy of disability insurance or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall be deemed to provide coverage for mammography for screening or diagnostic purposes upon the referral of a participating nurse practitioner, participating certified nurse-midwife, participating physician assistant, or participating physician, providing care to the patient and operating within the scope of practice provided under existing law.

(b) This section does not prevent the application of copayment or deductible provisions in a policy, nor does this section require that a policy be extended to cover any other procedures under an individual or a group policy.
 This section does not authorize a policyholder to receive the services required to be covered by this section if those services are furnished by a nonparticipating provider, unless the policyholder is referred to that provider by a participating physician, nurse practitioner, or certified nurse-midwife providing care.

(c) This section shall not apply to specialized health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRI-CARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, or specified disease insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 6.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.82.

Every policy of disability insurance which provides for the surgical procedure known as a laryngectomy and which is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1993, shall include coverage for prosthetic devices to restore a method of speaking for the patient incident to the laryngectomy.

Coverage for prosthetic devices shall be subject to the deductible and coinsurance conditions applied to the laryngectomy, and all other terms and conditions applicable to other benefits. As used in this section, “laryngectomy” means the removal of the larynx for medically necessary reasons, as determined by a licensed physician and surgeon.

Any provision in any policy issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1993, which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

As used in this section, “prosthetic devices” means and includes the provision of initial and subsequent prosthetic devices, including installation accessories, pursuant to an order of the patient’s physician and surgeon. “Prosthetic devices” does not include electronic voice producing machines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 808, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.83.

(a) On or after January 1, 1995, every policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state shall include obstetrician-gynecologists as eligible primary care physicians provided they meet the insurer’s written eligibility criteria for all specialists seeking primary care physician status.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “primary care physician” means a physician, as defined in Section 14254 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who has the responsibility for providing initial and primary care to patients, for maintaining the continuity of patient care, and for initiating referral for specialist care. This means providing care for the majority of health care problems, including, but not limited to, preventive services, acute and chronic conditions, and psychosocial issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 353, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.835.

(a) Every individual or group policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1999, shall be deemed to provide coverage for the screening and diagnosis of prostate cancer, including, but not limited to, prostate-specific antigen testing and digital rectal examinations, when medically necessary and consistent with good professional practice.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an individual or group policy to cover the surgical and other procedures known as radical prostatectomy, external beam radiation therapy, radiation seed implants, and combined hormonal therapy, or to prevent application of deductible
 or copayment provisions contained in the policy, nor shall this section be construed to require that coverage under an individual or group policy be extended to any other procedures.

(c) This section shall not apply to specified accident, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, or long-term care health insurance policies.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10123.83 (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 839) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 11.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.84.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the unique, private, and personal relationship between women patients and their obstetricians and gynecologists warrants direct access to obstetrical and gynecological physician services.

(b) Each policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, and that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state, shall allow a policyholder the option to seek obstetrical and gynecological physician services directly from an obstetrician and gynecologist or directly from a participating family physician and surgeon designated by the plan as providing obstetrical
 and gynecological services.

(c) In implementing this section, a disability insurer may establish reasonable requirements governing utilization protocols and the use of obstetricians and gynecologists or family physicians and surgeons, as provided for in subdivision (b), if those requirements are consistent with the intent of this
 section, are customarily applied to other physicians and surgeons, including primary care physicians and surgeons, to whom the policyholder has direct access, and are no more restrictive for the provision of obstetrical and gynecological physician services. A policyholder shall not be required to obtain prior approval from another physician, another provider, or the insurer prior to obtaining direct access to obstetrical and gynecological physician services, but the insurer may establish reasonable requirements for the participating obstetrician and gynecologist or the family physician and surgeon, as provided in subdivision (b), to communicate with the policyholder’s primary care physician regarding the policyholder’s condition, treatment, and any need for followup care.

(d) This section does not diminish the
 requirements of Section 10123.83.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 632, Sec. 13.   (AB 1622)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.85.

(a) For purposes of this section, the definitions in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code apply.
